Tennessee, session 114, SB2591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-5-102(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1) A county employee is disqualified from serving as a member of the county
legislative body. A county employee serving on a county commission on the effective
date of this act may continue to hold such office until the expiration of the term.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-1501, is amended by deleting
the language "unless otherwise authorized by law or local ordinance,".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-1502, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2591
012754
- 1 -